Wisconsin, session 2025, SB969.
do enact as follows:SB969,11Section 1. 66.10015 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB969,2,3266.10015 (1) (ag) “Data center” means a facility in this state that satisfies all 3of the following:SB969,2,541. The facility’s primary services are storage, management, and processing of 5digital data.SB969,2,1162. The facility is used to house computer and network systems, including 7associated components such as servers and network equipment and appliances; 8telecommunications systems; data storage systems; systems for monitoring and 9managing infrastructure performance, Internet-related equipment and services, 10data connections, and environmental controls; fire protection systems; and security 11systems and services.SB969,212Section 2. 66.10015 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB969,2,161366.10015 (7) Data centers. (a) 1. No political subdivision may enter into an 14agreement, including a nondisclosure agreement, that has the purpose or effect of 15concealing the details of the development of a data center from the public or 16preventing public review of a data center.SB969,3,212. Subd. 1. does not apply to an agreement that has the sole purpose of 2preventing public disclosure of a trade secret.SB969,3,53(b) No political subdivision may permit or approve a project for the creation of 4a data center if the data center or an agent of the data center violates s. 134.89 or if 5the political subdivision violates par. (a).SB969,36Section 3. 134.89 of the statutes is created to read:SB969,3,97134.89 Prohibiting data centers from entering into agreements 8intended to conceal information from the public. (1) In this section “data 9center” means a facility in this state that satisfies all of the following:SB969,3,1110(a) The facility’s primary services are storage, management, and processing 11of digital data.SB969,3,1712(b) The facility is used to house computer and network systems, including 13associated components such as servers and network equipment and appliances; 14telecommunications systems; data storage systems; systems for monitoring and 15managing infrastructure performance, Internet-related equipment and services, 16data connections, and environmental controls; fire protection systems; and security 17systems and services.SB969,3,2118(2) No data center, including an agent of a data center, may enter into any 19agreement, including a nondisclosure agreement, that has the purpose or effect of 20concealing the details of the development of the data center from the public or 21preventing public review of the data center.SB969,3,2322(3) This section does not apply to an agreement that has the sole purpose of 23preventing public disclosure of a trade secret.SB969,3,2424